California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(b) The claimant is found to be spending, or unless enjoined to be about to spend, moneys otherwise than in accordance with the terms of the allocation.

(c) An adjustment is proved to be necessary to reconcile the estimates on which the allocation was based with the actual figures when these are available.

(d) The financial needs of the claimant differ from those at the time of the allocation due to changed circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

99236.

No funds from the fund shall be budgeted, allocated, or expended for any project which calls for any change in passenger train stations or loading platforms used by the National Railroad Passenger Corporation, unless the change has been submitted to the National Railroad Passenger Corporation for review and comment which may include a recommendation for a modification in the change. If the agency submitting the change elects not to accept the recommendation of the National Railroad Passenger Corporation, it shall submit the matter to the director who shall determine whether the disputed recommendation for a modification in the change shall be
 followed by the agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

99238.

Each transportation planning agency shall provide for the establishment of a social services transportation advisory council for each county, or counties operating under a joint powers agreement, which is not subject to the apportionment restriction established in Section 99232.

(a) The social services transportation advisory council shall consist of the
 following members:

(1) One representative of potential transit users who is 60 years of age or older.

(2) One representative of potential transit users who is disabled.

(3) Two representatives of the local social service providers for seniors, including one representative of a social service transportation provider, if one exists.

(4) Two representatives of local social service providers for the disabled, including one representative of a social service transportation provider, if one exists.

(5) One representative of a local social service provider for persons of limited means.

(6) Two representatives from the local
 consolidated transportation service agency, designated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 15975 of the Government Code, if one exists, including one representative from an operator, if one exists.

(7) The transportation planning agency may appoint additional members in accordance with the procedure prescribed in subdivision (b).

(b) Members of the social services transportation advisory council shall be appointed by the transportation planning agency which shall recruit candidates for appointment from a broad representation of social service and transit providers representing the elderly, the disabled, and persons of limited means. In appointing council members, the transportation planning agency shall strive to attain geographic and minority representation among council members. Of the initial appointments to the council, one-third of them shall be for a one-year term,
 one-third shall be for a two-year term, and one-third shall be for a three-year term. Subsequent to the initial appointment, the term of appointment shall be for three years, which may be renewed for an additional three-year term. The transportation planning agency may, at its discretion, delegate its responsibilities for appointment pursuant to this subdivision to the board of supervisors.

(c) The social services transportation advisory council shall have the following responsibilities:

(1) Annually participate in the identification of transit needs in the jurisdiction, including unmet transit needs that may exist within the jurisdiction of the council and that may be reasonable to meet by establishing or contracting for new public transportation or specialized transportation services or by expanding existing services.

(2) Annually review and recommend action by the transportation planning agency for the area within the jurisdiction of the council which finds, by resolution, that (A) there are no unmet transit needs, (B) there are no unmet transit needs that are reasonable to meet, or (C) there are unmet transit needs, including needs that are reasonable to meet.

(3) Advise the transportation planning agency on any other major transit issues, including the coordination and consolidation of specialized transportation services.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that duplicative advisory councils shall not be established where transit advisory councils currently exist and that those existing advisory councils shall, instead, become part of the social services transportation advisory council and shall assume any new responsibilities pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 11.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

99238.5.

(a) The transportation planning agency shall ensure the establishment and implementation of a citizen participation process appropriate for each county, or counties if operating under a joint powers agreement, utilizing the social services transportation advisory council as a mechanism to solicit the input of transit dependent and transit disadvantaged persons, including the elderly, disabled, and
 persons of limited means. The process shall include provisions for at least one public hearing in the jurisdiction represented by the social services transportation advisory council. Hearings shall be scheduled to ensure broad community participation and, if possible, the location of the hearings shall be rotated among the various communities within the advisory council’s jurisdiction. Notice of the hearing, including the date, place, and specific purpose of the hearing shall be given at least 30 days in advance through publication in a newspaper of general circulation. The transportation planning agency shall also send written notification to those persons and organizations which have indicated, through its citizen participation or any other source of information, an interest in the subject of the hearing.

(b) In addition to public hearings, the transportation planning agency shall consider other methods of obtaining public feedback on public
 transportation needs. Those methods may include, but are not limited to, teleconferencing, questionnaires, telecanvassing, and electronic mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 12.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

99241.

(a) Except for allocations made for purposes of Section 99234 and subdivision (a) of Section 99400, which shall be subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the transportation planning agency, all matters necessary and convenient to the implementation of this chapter shall be subject to rules and regulations, consistent with statute, adopted by the department, with the advice and consent of the commission, and those rules and regulations may be revised from time to time.

(b) The rules and regulations shall specify the procedures by which evaluation and review by
 the transportation planning agency of public transportation claims shall be accomplished, and shall require submission of corresponding budgets or financial plans, certified financial statements, and other information required in connection therewith. The rules and regulations shall provide for the orderly and periodic distribution of moneys in the fund so that the areas served by the operator will be provided public transportation services on a continuing basis and so that there will be an orderly improvement and maintenance of the system of the operator. The rules and regulations shall provide for the approval of sufficient moneys from the fund to accomplish the intent of the Legislature as expressed in the findings and declarations in Section 99220.

(c) The rules and regulations may require that the transportation planning agency, in reviewing claims, give due consideration to the level of the operator’s passenger fares and charges, the
 efficiency of the operator’s operations and operating policies and practices, the extent to which the operator is meeting the transportation needs of the area served, and the extent to which the operator is making full use of other available revenues and funds, including federal transportation grants.

(d) The Controller shall annually review the rules and regulations adopted by the department with respect to reporting and auditing procedures and shall make written recommendations for revisions to the department. After consultation with the Controller, the director shall undertake to amend the rules and regulations in accordance with the recommendations.

(e) Rules and regulations adopted by the department with respect to reporting and auditing procedures shall apply to all expenditures of funds allocated pursuant to this chapter.

This
 section shall become operative on July 1, 1987.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 988, Sec. 9.   Section operative July 1, 1987, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

99241.5.

All rules and regulations adopted by the Secretary of the Business, Transportation and Housing Agency pursuant to Section 99241, as it read prior to its amendment by the act adding this section, and in effect on January 1, 1985, shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable unless and until amended or repealed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

99242.

In the event that a claimant is not satisfied with his approved claim or other action taken by the transportation planning agency, a notification with supporting documentation may be filed with the secretary, who shall conduct an investigation and evaluation of the disagreement between the claimant and the transportation planning agency. The secretary shall notify the involved parties of his findings, which shall be a final settlement of the issue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

99243.

(a) The Controller, in cooperation with the department and the operators, shall design and adopt a uniform system of accounts and records, from which the operators shall prepare and submit annual reports of their operation to transportation planning agencies, county transportation commissions, or the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board having jurisdiction over them and to the Controller within seven months after the end of the fiscal year. The report shall contain underlying data from audited financial statements prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, if this data is available. The report shall specify (1) the amount of revenue generated from each source and its application for the prior fiscal year, and (2)
 the data necessary to determine which section, with respect to Sections
 99268.1, 99268.2, 99268.3, 99268.4, 99268.5, and 99268.9, the operator is required to be in compliance in order to be eligible for funds under this article.

(b) (1) For the purposes of the State Transit Assistance Program, which is governed by Sections 99312 to 99314.9, inclusive, the Controller shall provide a mechanism for each transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board to report to the Controller those operators within its jurisdiction that are STA-eligible operators, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 99312.2.

(2) The mechanism shall require each transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan
 Transit Development Board to report to the Controller those STA-eligible operators within its jurisdiction that are both:

(A) Eligible to claim local transportation funds under either Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) or Article 8 (commencing with Section 99400), or under both articles.

(B) A public transportation operator, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 99312.2.

(3) The Controller shall rely upon that verification to determine whether or not an operator is an STA-eligible operator pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 99312.2. The transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board shall provide
 this information to the Controller within seven months after the end of each fiscal year.

(c) As a supplement to the annual report prepared pursuant to subdivision (a), each operator shall include an estimate of the amount of revenues to be generated from each source and its proposed application for the next fiscal year, and a report on the extent to which it has contracted with the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, including the nature and dollar amounts of all contracts entered into during the reporting period and proposed for the next reporting period.

(d) The Controller shall instruct the county auditor to withhold payments from the fund to an operator that has not submitted its annual report to the Controller within the time specified by subdivision
 (a).

(e) In establishing the uniform system of accounts and records, the Controller shall include the data required by the United States Department of Transportation and the department.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law or any regulation, including any California Code of Regulations provision, the City of El Segundo, the City of Huntington Beach, the City of Inglewood, the City of Long Beach, or the City of South Lake Tahoe may select, for purposes of this chapter, on a one-time basis, a fiscal year that does not end on June 30. After the city has sent a written notice to the Secretary of Transportation and the Controller that the city has selected a fiscal year other than one ending on June 30, the fiscal year selected by the city shall be its fiscal year for all reports
 required by the state under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 69.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

99243.5.

(a) On the basis of data in the annual reports submitted pursuant to Section 99243 and the information submitted pursuant to Section 99406 to the Controller, the Controller shall
 compile, publish, and make publicly available on the Controller’s internet website the submitted data and information on or before November 1 of each year.

(b) The Controller shall take steps as the Controller deems necessary to ensure that the data and information submitted are adequate and accurate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 205, Sec. 2.   (AB 1157)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

99244.

(a) (1) Each transportation planning agency shall annually identify, analyze, and recommend potential productivity improvements that could lower the operating costs of those operators who operate at least 50 percent of their vehicle service miles, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 99247, within the area under its jurisdiction. However, where a transit development board created pursuant to Division 11 (commencing with Section 120000) or a county
 transportation commission exists, the board or commission, as the case may be, shall have the responsibility of the transportation planning agency with respect to potential productivity improvements. The recommendations for improvements and productivity shall include, but not be limited to, those recommendations related to productivity made in the performance audit conducted pursuant to Section 99246.

(2) A
 committee for the purpose of providing advice on productivity improvements may be formed by the responsible entity. The membership of this committee shall consist of representatives from the management of the operators, organizations of employees of the operators, and users of the transportation services of the operators located within the area under the jurisdiction of the responsible entity.

(3) (A) Before determining the allocation to an operator for the next fiscal year, the responsible entity shall review and evaluate the efforts made
 by the operator to implement
 the recommended improvements.

(B) If the responsible entity determines that the operator has not made a reasonable effort to implement the recommended improvements, the responsible entity shall not approve the allocation to the operator for the support of its public transportation system for the next fiscal year
 that exceeds the allocation to the operator for those purposes for the current fiscal year.

(b) For the 2020–21 to 2022–23, inclusive, fiscal years, each transportation planning agency, transportation development board, and county transportation commission, is exempt from the requirements described in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 81, Sec. 4.   (AB 149)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

99245.

Each transportation planning agency, transit development board created pursuant to Division 11 (commencing with Section 120000), and county transportation commission shall be responsible to ensure that all claimants to whom it directs the allocation of funds pursuant to this chapter shall submit to it an annual certified fiscal audit conducted by an entity other than the claimant.

A report on the audit shall be submitted to the transportation planning agency, transit development board, county transportation commission, and to the Controller within 180 days after the end of the fiscal year. However, the
 responsible entity may grant an extension of up to 90 days as it deems necessary. The report shall include a certification that the funds allocated to the claimant pursuant to this chapter were expended in conformance with applicable laws and rules and regulations. Except for the first report, the report shall also include the audited amounts for the fiscal year prior to the fiscal year audited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 988, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

99245.2.

(a) A transit district or other provider of public transportation services subject to an audit pursuant to Section 99245, that receives funds from other sources which also require a fiscal audit, may expand the scope of its audit performed pursuant to Section 99245 to include the conditions and purposes of those other funds.

(b) A transportation planning agency, transit development board, county transportation commission, air quality management district, air pollution
 control district, or local transportation authority shall not require any additional fiscal audit of an entity if that entity has completed an expanded audit pursuant to subdivision (a) that encompasses the scope, time period, and funding condition of the agency providing funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

99246.

(a) (1) The transportation planning agency shall designate entities other than itself, a county transportation commission, a transit development board, or an operator to make a performance audit of its activities and the activities of each operator to whom it allocates funds. The transportation planning agency shall consult with the entity to be audited prior to designating the entity to make the performance audit.

(2) Where a transit development board created pursuant to Division 11 (commencing with Section 120000) or a county transportation commission exists, the board or commission, as the case may be, shall designate
 entities other than itself, a transportation planning agency, or an operator to make a performance audit of its activities and those of operators located in the area under its jurisdiction to whom it directs the allocation of funds. The board or commission shall consult with the entity to be audited prior to designating the entity to make the performance audit.

(b) The performance audit shall evaluate the efficiency, effectiveness, and economy of the operation of the entity being audited and shall be conducted in accordance with the efficiency, economy, and program results portions of the Comptroller General’s “Standards for Audit of Governmental Organizations, Programs, Activities, and Functions.” Performance audits shall be conducted triennially pursuant to a schedule established by the transportation planning agency, transit
 development board, or county transportation commission having jurisdiction over the operator.

(c) The performance audit of the transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, or transit development board shall be submitted to the director. The transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, or transit development board, as the case may be, shall certify in writing to the director that the performance audit of operators located in the area under its jurisdiction has been completed.

(d) (1) With respect to an operator providing public transportation services, the performance audit shall include, but not be limited to, a verification of the operator’s operating cost per passenger, operating cost per vehicle service hour,
 passengers per vehicle service hour, passengers per vehicle service mile, and vehicle service hours per employee, as defined in Section 99247. The performance audit shall include, but not be limited to, consideration of the needs and types of the passengers being served and the employment of part-time drivers and the contracting with common carriers of persons operating under a franchise or license to provide services during peak hours, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 99260.2.

(2) The performance audit may include performance evaluations both for the entire system and for the system excluding special, new, or expanded services instituted to test public transportation service growth potential.

(e) The performance audit prepared pursuant to this section shall be
 made available to the public pursuant to the provisions of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 405.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

99247.

For purposes of Section 99246, and as used elsewhere in this article:

(a) “Operating cost” means all costs in the operating expense object classes exclusive of the costs in the depreciation and amortization expense object class of the uniform system of accounts and records adopted by the Controller pursuant to Section 99243. “Operating cost” excludes all subsidies for commuter rail services operated on railroad lines under the jurisdiction of the
 Federal Railroad Administration, all direct costs for providing charter services, all vehicle lease costs, and principal and interest payments on capital projects funded with certificates of participation.

(b) “Operating cost per passenger” means the operating cost divided by the total passengers.

(c) “Operating cost per vehicle service hour” means the operating cost divided by the vehicle service hours.

(d) “Passengers per vehicle service hour” means the total passengers divided by the vehicle service hours.

(e) “Passengers per vehicle service mile” means the total passengers divided by the vehicle service miles.

(f) “Total passengers” means the number of boarding passengers, whether revenue producing or not, carried by the public transportation system.

(g) “Transit vehicle” means a vehicle, including, but not limited to, one operated on rails or tracks, which is used for public transportation services funded, in whole or in part, under this chapter.

(h) “Vehicle service hours” means the total number of hours that each transit vehicle is in revenue service, including layover time.

(i) “Vehicle service miles” means the total number of miles that each transit vehicle is in revenue service.

(j) “Vehicle service hours per employee” means the vehicle service hours divided by the number of employees employed in connection with the public transportation system, based on the assumption that 2,000 person-hours of work in one year constitute one employee. The count of employees shall also include those individuals employed by the operator which provide services to the agency of the operator responsible for the operation of the public transportation system even though not employed in that agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 716, Sec. 3.   (SB 508)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

99248.

No operator is eligible to receive an allocation under this chapter for any fiscal year until the transmittal of reports of its performance audit to the entity which determines the allocation to the operator and the transportation planning agency for the three-year period ending one year prior to the beginning of the fiscal year of the proposed allocation. The transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, or transit development board, as the case may be, shall make the reports available to interested parties.

In conformance with Section 99246, and prior to September 1 of each fiscal year,
 the transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, or metropolitan transit development board, as the case may be, shall provide to the director and Controller a schedule of performance audits to be submitted during that fiscal year and a list of all operators or claimants who operated or commenced operations during the prior fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 630, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

99249.

The cost of making the performance audits may be deemed an administrative cost of the transportation planning agencies for purposes of Section 99233.1. However, the Legislature encourages the use of funds made available by the federal government to support such purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1043.)
-------------------------------------------

99250.

(a) All charter bus services authorized to be performed by a public transportation system receiving funding under this chapter shall contribute financially to the reduction of deficits incurred in the operation of scheduled route service. In addition, the charter bus service shall not interfere with regularly scheduled service to the public or compete unfairly with private operators where the private operators are willing and able to provide charter bus service.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (d), charter bus service rates and minimums shall be established that
 are either of the following:

(1) At least equal to the average of the three lowest current rates charged by private charter bus carriers actually operating charters originating in the same service area of the public transportation system during the prior year.

(2) At least equal to the marginal cost of each charter operated.

(c) All charter bus service rates shall be reviewed and adjusted not less than semiannually to reflect variations in actual and assumed costs, as well as private charter bus carrier rates.

(d) If the operator of a public transportation system determines that there is a public need that cannot otherwise be met, the operator may provide charter bus services to charitable or public service organizations at direct cost, not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or a total of 40 charter buses per year, whichever occurs first.

(e) (1) This
 section does not apply to charter bus services
 that are incidental to the holding of the 2026 FIFA World Cup in the County of Los Angeles and the greater San Francisco Bay area during the period from June 1, 2026, to July 31, 2026, inclusive, if the public transportation system establishes charter bus rates for those services
 that are sufficient to pay all
 marginal costs related to those services,
 that are at least equal to the average of the lowest rates charged by the three largest private charter party carriers operating similar service within the County of Los Angeles or the greater San Francisco Bay area, as applicable, and that contribute financially to the reduction of deficits incurred by the system in the operation of scheduled route service.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “greater San Francisco
 Bay area” means the region comprised of the City and County of San Francisco and the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, Monterey, Napa, San Benito, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Solano, and Sonoma.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 109, Sec. 5.   (SB 153)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

99250.5.

(a) (1) At any publicly noticed meeting of the governing body of an operator, a representative of a private transportation service provider may request the operator to perform a cost comparison analysis of public transit service provided by vehicles equipped with rubber tires before the governing body acts on a route restructuring or service addition under consideration. The operator may agree to perform a cost comparison analysis pursuant to this section or alternatively, may so agree on the condition that the
 private transportation service provider that requested the cost comparison analysis agrees to pay the operator’s actual cost of conducting the analysis. If the operator agrees to perform the cost comparison analysis, the private transportation service provider requesting the cost comparison analysis shall supply any information necessary and relevant to complete the analysis.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require operators to perform a cost comparison analysis. At its sole discretion, the operator’s governing body may elect not to perform a cost comparison analysis. However, if the governing body determines not to perform a cost comparison analysis, it shall specify the reasons for that determination in a resolution adopted at a publicly noticed meeting.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Cost comparison analysis” means a study of the route restructuring or service addition under consideration by the operator, that compares the cost to the operator of directly providing those services compared to the cost to the operator of procuring those services from private entities. The study shall utilize a full cost allocation method that is consistent with generally accepted cost allocation principles.

(2) “Route restructuring” means a permanent change in routing that decreases or increases the total number of daily transit revenue service miles or hours by 25 percent or more.

(3) “Service addition” means an increase in the total number of daily transit revenue service miles or hours on an existing route by 50 percent or more.

(c) If the
 governing body performs a cost comparison analysis pursuant to this section, the results of the analysis shall be fully disclosed at a publicly noticed meeting.

(d) This section does not apply to an operator in a county with less than 300,000 population or who operates less than 10 buses.

(e) The operator may adopt appropriate procedures to implement the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 722, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

99251.

No claim submitted by an operator pursuant to this chapter shall be approved unless it is accompanied by a certification completed within the last 13 months from the Department of the California Highway Patrol indicating that the operator is in compliance with Section 1808.1 of the Vehicle Code. The certification may be issued following a terminal inspection, or a terminal reinspection conducted within 60 days thereafter, by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1988, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 726.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Claims for Funds [99260. - 99273.]

99260.

Claims may be filed with the transportation planning agency by operators under this article for the following purposes:

(a) The support of public transportation systems.

(b) Aid to public transportation research and demonstration projects.

(c) Contributions for the construction of grade separation projects specified in Section 99318.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

99260.2.

(a) Claims may be filed with the transportation planning agency by operators to contract with common carriers of persons operating under a franchise or license to provide transportation services during peak hours.

“Peak hours” means the period of time during a day which have a clearly greater-than-average level of patronage, typically the two periods of time which reflect the influx of home-work and work-home patronage on a transportation system. 

(b) Claims may be filed with the transportation planning agency by a transit district to make
 bulk purchases of passenger tickets for passenger rail services, if it is authorized to make such purchases by its enabling legislation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

99260.5.

(a) Claims may also be filed with the transportation planning agency by a city and county or a transit district under this article for payments to be made to a railroad corporation subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission and engaged in the transportation of persons, as defined in Section 208, for operating losses incurred in such transportation of persons between points within the city and county or the district, as the case may be, and for that portion of the operating losses incurred in such transportation of persons in the city and county or the district, as the case may be, whose origin or destination, or both, are
 outside the city and county or district.

(b) A city and county or a transit district receiving funds under a claim filed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall use those funds for the purposes specified in that subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

99260.6.

Public agencies authorized to file claims pursuant to Section 99234.9 may file claims under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 995, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

99260.7.

In order to provide, or to contract to provide, transportation services using vehicles for the exclusive use of elderly or disabled persons, a city or a county, which is contributing funds it is eligible to receive under this article to a joint powers agency of which it is a member to operate a public transportation system, may also file a claim under this article and may also file a claim for funds made available
 pursuant to Section 99313.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 13.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

99261.

The transportation planning agency may adopt rules and regulations supplemental to, and consistent with, those of the department to further delineate procedures for the submission of claims and stating criteria by which they will be analyzed and evaluated.

The criteria may include a statement of intent to disallow any portion of an operator’s claim which calls for moneys to finance unreasonable or arbitrary increases in executive level salaries based on consideration of executive level salaries in other public agencies and in the public transportation industry, both nationally and within the state.

To the extent necessary to perform its duties under this article, the transportation planning agency has full access to the books, records, and accounts of claimant operators.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

99261.5.

The San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board shall adopt rules and regulations for its area of jurisdiction.

The transportation planning agency may include in its rules and regulations any rule and regulation of the transit development board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1055, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

99262.

Claims for public transportation systems may include claims for money for all purposes necessary and convenient to the development and operation of the system, including planning and contributions to the transportation planning process, acquisition of real property, construction of facilities and buildings, purchase and replacement of vehicles (including those usable by disabled persons), and system operation, maintenance,
 and repair, payment for any of which purposes may take the form of direct expenditures or payment of principal and interest on equipment trust certificates, bonded or other indebtedness, or any amounts in accomplishment of a defeasance of any outstanding revenue bond indenture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 14.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

99263.

An approved claim may include an amount to pay the principal and interest on bonds of the applicant for a public transportation system.

This section shall not be construed as an authorization to any applicant to pledge revenues received from the county’s local transportation fund, unless approved by the voters of the county under Article 7 (commencing with Section 99320) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99264.

An operator shall not be eligible for allocation under this article if it routinely staffs with two or more persons a vehicle for public transportation purposes designed to be operated by one person.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 99266.7 by Stats. 1979, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

99266.

No moneys may be allocated to an operator whose claim includes funds for an increase in operating budget in excess of 15 percent above the preceding year or substantial increase or decrease in scope of operations or capital budget provisions for major new fixed facilities, unless the operator’s claim is accompanied by statements, reports, and such other supporting data as may be reasonably required to substantiate such change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

99267.

If an operator ceases operations, any capital acquisitions made by that operator from funds allocated to it pursuant to this article may be transferred to any claimant to provide transportation services under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 630, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.

The expenditure of the funds received under this article by an operator may in no year exceed 50 percent of the amount required to meet operating, maintenance, and capital and debt service requirements of the system after deduction therefrom of approved federal grants estimated to be received and funds estimated to be allocated pursuant to Section 99314.5.

Notwithstanding the 50-percent limitation, the amount budgeted for capital requirements in any year or other period up to five years, less the amount of federal and other state funds granted or approved therefor, may be allocated and expended for capital improvements to a